Rhode Island, session 2025, SB119.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
(1) Bills passed by state legislatures can mandate or encourage state agency action, remove
barriers that exist to the use of buprenorphine, in state laws or agency rules, and appropriate money
to fund state agencies, providers, or community-based groups. Legislatures can also hold oversight
hearings on executive branch activities;
(2) States that enact new policies to increase access to buprenorphine should also perform
two key actions: collect data on opioid use disorder (OUD) prevalence and treatment rates, and
review and consider mitigating any long-standing structural barriers that will dilute efforts to reduce
opioid addiction. States need to look at their OUD prevalence rates, use of medications, and
treatment retention by age, race/ethnicity, sex, geography, and other important markers. This data
collection is the only way to determine which interventions are most needed and which populations
(in which geographic areas) to target. States can collect data for services covered by Medicaid,
federal block grants, opioid settlement funds (acquired through lawsuits with drug manufacturers
and distributors), state discretionary grants, and commercial health insurers;
(3) People with OUD often have a range of needs beyond care for their addiction, including
treatment for co-occurring mental illness, general medical care, and access to social supports such
as housing and employment. Some states are building delivery models that formalize the
connections between these service systems and strengthen individual systems, all with the intent of

improving patients’ prospects for recovery. Medicaid, as the largest payer of OUD care, has been
a leader in implementing many of these system reforms.
SECTION 2. Section 21-28.2-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28.2 entitled "Drug
Abuse Control" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.2-2. Rules and regulations.
The department shall make any rules and regulations, including rules and regulations that
lead to the more liberal utilization of buprenorphine, respecting the care and treatment of patients
and persons referred to the department’s care and the management of the department’s affairs as
are deemed necessary to carry out the expressed purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000392
========
LC000392 - Page 2 of 3